fr: Forme du P-Tex: Bougie; Granulé; Pastille; Poudre; Ruban; Bâtonnet; Feuille; Bâton; Bande; Autre
sk-SK: Forma materiálu P-Tex: Sviečka; Granuly; Pelety; Prášok; Páska; Tyčinka; Plát; Tyčinka; Pás; Iné
pl: Forma P-Tex: Świeca; Granulat; Pellet; Proszek; Taśma; Pałeczka; Arkusz; Sztyft; Pasek; Inne
nl: P-Tex vorm: Kaars; Granulaat; Pellet; Poeder; Lint; Staaf; Vel; Stick; Strip; Overige
zh-CN: P-Tex 形态: 蜡烛状; 颗粒; 丸状; 粉末; 带状; 棒状; 片状; 棍状; 条状; 其他
pt-PT: Formulário P-Tex: Vela; Grânulo; Pellet; Pó; Fita; Vara; Folha; Bastão; Tira; Outro
en: P-Tex form: Candle; Granule; Pellet; Powder; Ribbon; Rod; Sheet; Stick; Strip; Other
ru: Форма P-Tex: Свеча; Гранулы; Пеллеты; Порошок; Лента; Стержень; Лист; Палочка; Полоса; Другое
fi: P-Tex-materiaalin muoto: Kynttilä; Rakeet; Pelletit; Jauhe; Nauha; Sauva; Arkki; Tikku; Liuska; Muu
es: Formato del P-Tex: Vela; Gránulo; Pellet; Polvo; Cinta; Varilla; Hoja; Barra; Tira; Otro
de: Form des P-Tex: Kerze; Granulat; Pellet; Pulver; Band; Stab; Folie; Stick; Streifen; Sonstige
lt-LT: P-Tex forma: Žvakė; Granulės; Tabletė; Milteliai; Juosta; Lazdelė; Lakštas; Lazdelė; Juostelė; Kita
hu: P-Tex formája: Gyertya; Granulátum; Pellet; Por; Szalag; Rúd; Lap; Pálca; Csík; Egyéb
pt-BR: P-Tex forma: Vela; Grânulo; Pellet; Pó; Fita; Haste; Folha; Bastão; Tira; Outros
sv: P-Tex-form: Ljus; Granulat; Pellets; Pulver; Band; Stav; Ark; Pinne; Remsa; Övrigt
zh-TW: P-Tex 形式: 蠟燭狀; 顆粒狀; 粒狀; 粉末; 帶狀; 棒狀; 片狀; 條狀; 細長條; 其他
cs: Forma/formát P-Tex: Svíčka; Granule; Peleta; Prášek; Páska; Tyčinka; Plát; Tyčinka; Proužek; Ostatní
bg-BG: Форма на P-Tex: Свещ; Гранули; Пелети; Прах; Лента; Пръчка; Лист; Пръчица; Ивица; Друго
ko: P-Tex 형태: 캔들; 과립; 펠릿; 파우더; 리본; 로드; 시트; 스틱; 스트립; 기타
it: Forma P-Tex: Candela; Granulo; Pellet; Polvere; Nastro; Candeletta; Foglio; Stick; Striscia; Altro
el: Φόρμα P-Tex: Κερί; Κόκκοι; Πέλετ; Σκόνη; Κορδέλα; Ράβδος; Φύλλο; Στικ; Ταινία; Άλλο
hr-HR: P-Tex obrazac: Svijeća; Granule; Peleti; Prah; Vrpca; Štapić; List; Štapić; Traka; Ostalo
th: รูปแบบ P-Tex: เทียน; เม็ดแกรนูล; เม็ด; ผง; ริบบิ้น; แท่ง; แผ่น; ก้าน; แถบ; อื่นๆ
da: P-Tex-formular: Lys; Granulat; Pille; Pulver; Bånd; Stang; Ark; Pind; Strimmel; Andet
vi: Dạng P-Tex: Dạng nến; Dạng hạt; Dạng viên; Dạng bột; Dạng ruy băng; Dạng que; Dạng tấm; Dạng thanh; Dạng dải; Khác
nb: Form på P-Tex: Lys; Granulat; Pellets; Pulver; Bånd; Stang; Ark; Stav; Strimmel; Annet
sl-SI: Oblika P-Tex-a: Sveča; Granulat; Pelet; Prah; Trak; Palica; Plošča; Palčka; Trak; Drugo
ja: P-Tex形状: キャンドル; 顆粒; ペレット; パウダー; リボン; ロッド; シート; スティック; ストリップ; その他
tr: P-Tex formu: Mum; Granül; Pelet; Toz; Şerit; Çubuk; Tabaka; Çubuk; Şerit; Diğer
ro-RO: Formă de prezentare P-Tex: Lumânare; Granulă; Peletă; Pudră; Panglică; Tijă; Foaie; Băț; Bandă; Altele